Vermont, session 2025-2026, H802.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 2961 is amended to read:
§ 2961. CENSUS GRANT
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Average daily membership” shall have has the same meaning as in
subdivision 4001(1) of this title, except it shall exclude excludes State-placed
students.
(2) “Average daily membership of a supervisory union” means the
aggregate average daily membership of the school districts that are members of
the supervisory union or, for a supervisory district, the average daily
membership of the supervisory district.
VT LEG #386391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.802
2026 Page 2 of 5
(3) “Long-term membership” of a supervisory union in any school year
means the average of the supervisory union’s average daily membership over
the most recent three school years for which data are available.
(4) “Uniform base amount” means an amount determined by:
(A) dividing an amount:
(i) equal to the average State appropriation for fiscal years 2018,
2019, and 2020 for special education under sections 2961 (standard
mainstream block grants), 2963 (special education expenditures
reimbursement), and 2963a (exceptional circumstances) of this title; and , as
adjusted for inflation,
(ii) increased by:
(I) for each of fiscal years 2021, 2022, and 2023, the annual
change in the National Income and Product Accounts (NIPA) Implicit Price
Deflator for State and Local Government Consumption Expenditures and
Gross Investment as reported by the U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of
Economic Analysis (inflation factor); and
(II) for each of fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026, the average
inflation factor for fiscal years 2021, 2022, and 2023; by
(B) the statewide long-term membership.
(5) “Adjusted for inflation” means adjusting the uniform base amount
by the National Income and Product Accounts (NIPA) implicit price deflator
VT LEG #386391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.802
2026 Page 3 of 5
for state and local government consumption expenditures and gross investment
published by the U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic
Analysis, from fiscal year 2020 through the fiscal year for which the amount is
being determined, and rounding upward to the nearest whole dollar amount.
(b) The State commits to satisfying its special education maintenance of
fiscal support requirement under 34 C.F.R. § 300.163(a).
(c) Each supervisory union shall receive a census grant each fiscal year to
support the provision of special education services to students on an
individualized education program. Supervisory unions shall use this funding
and other available sources of funding to provide special education services to
students in accordance with their individualized education programs as
mandated under federal law. A supervisory union may use census grant funds
to support the delivery of the supervisory union’s comprehensive system of
educational services under sections 2901 and 2902 of this title, but shall not
use census grant funds in a manner that abrogates its responsibility to provide
special education services to students in accordance with their individualized
education programs as mandated under federal law.
(d)(1)(A) For fiscal year 2023, the amount of the census grant for a
supervisory union shall be:
(i) the average amount it received for fiscal years 2018, 2019, and
2020 or the average amount it received for fiscal years 2019, 2020, and 2021,
VT LEG #386391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.802
2026 Page 4 of 5
whichever amount is greater, from the State for special education under
sections 2961 (standard mainstream block grants), 2963 (special education
expenditures reimbursement), and 2963a (exceptional circumstances) of this
title; increased by
(ii) the annual change in the National Income and Product
Accounts (NIPA) Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government
Consumption Expenditures and Gross Investment as reported by the U.S.
Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic Analysis.
(B) The amount determined under subdivision (A) of this subdivision
(1) shall be divided by the supervisory union’s long-term membership, to
determine the base amount of the census grant, which is the amount of the
census grant calculated on a per student basis.
(2) For fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years, the The amount of
the census grant for a supervisory union shall be the uniform base amount
multiplied by the supervisory union’s long-term membership.
(3) For fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026, the amount of the census
grant for a supervisory union shall be determined by multiplying the
supervisory union’s long-term membership by a base amount established under
this subdivision. The base amounts for each supervisory union for fiscal years
2024, 2025, and 2026 shall move gradually the supervisory union’s fiscal year
2023 base amount to the fiscal year 2027 uniform base amount by prorating the
VT LEG #386391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.802
2026 Page 5 of 5
change between the supervisory union’s fiscal year 2023 base amount and the
fiscal year 2027 uniform base amount over this three-fiscal-year period.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386391 v.1